South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Citizenship Verification Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 1, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-1-260.  (A) A law enforcement agency must check the immigration status of all persons arrested by its officers through the United States Department of Homeland Security's Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program. (B) Upon an arrest, conviction, or both, the person's immigration status must be recorded in his criminal record. (C) No later than January first of each year, SLED must provide a report to the General Assembly containing the number of persons arrested, convicted, or both during the previous twelve months who are in the State illegally. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----